District of Columbia statutes.
4-609

Existing rights to reimbursement preserved.

This chapter shall not be construed to limit or repeal any other provision of law that invests the District with a right to reimbursement for health-care assistance provided to a beneficiary or specified class of beneficiary.

June 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-86, § 10, 31 DCR 2098
1981 Ed., § 3-509.
Police and firefighters medical care recovery, see § 5-601 et seq.
Disability compensation, recovery from third persons, adjustment after recovery, see § 1-623.32.
Disability compensation, medical services and initial medical and other benefits, furnishing to District government employees, see § 1-623.03.